Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-738
Issuance of permit; commence construction and complete water well within one year; failure; effect.

When any permit is approved pursuant to section 46-736, the applicant shall commence construction as soon as possible after the date of approval and shall complete the construction and equip the water well prior to the date specified in the conditions of approval, which date shall be not more than one year after the date of approval, unless it is clearly demonstrated in the application that one year is an insufficient period of time for such construction. If the applicant fails to complete the project under the terms of the permit, the district may withdraw the permit.

Laws 1975, LB 577, § 7;

Laws 1983, LB 23, § 6;

Laws 1993, LB 131, § 28;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 46-662;

Laws 1996, LB 108, § 38;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 46-656.32;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 78.